Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-5,108
Act; applicability.

The Broadband Internet Service Infrastructure Act does not apply to railroad right-of-way or electric utility easements in or to railroad right-of-way property. Crossings of railroad rights-of-way by telecommunications carriers are governed by section 86-164.

Laws 2020, LB992, § 7.
November 14, 2020